Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 1
G

ENERAL PROVISIONS

Cross references.

- Registration of geologists, T. 43, C. 19.

12-5-70. Prospecting for underground water supplies - Powers of department.

The department may, whenever directed so to do by the Governor, prospect for underground water supplies at such places in the state as the Governor may direct. In so doing, the department may drill wells, make borings and soundings, and do and perform such other acts as may be necessary in determining the location and existence of underground water supplies for public or industrial uses, including the acquisition of sites for drilling operations.

(Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 5, § 1.)

12-5-71. Prospecting for underground water supplies - Records of findings; acceptance of federal grants.

The department shall keep full records of all its findings, including full information as to geological formations encountered in drilling operations, and shall, in addition to keeping such records, file copies of the same with the Secretary of State. The department may also file copies of such records with the proper bureau or department of the United States and may accept any available federal grant for use in carrying on the work authorized by Code Section 12-5-70.

(Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 5, § 2.)

12-5-72. Prospecting for underground water supplies - Contracts with counties or municipalities for use of water.

If the department, in carrying out Code Section 12-5-70, shall encounter water in sufficient quantities to be useful to any municipality or county in furnishing water to its inhabitants, the department may contract with such municipality for the use of such water, and, in so doing, may sell or lease any such well or water supply, provided that no such lease shall be for longer than 30 years. Such contract, whether in the form of a lease contract or a sales contract, shall be subject to approval as to form by the Attorney General.

(Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 5, § 4.)

12-5-73. Prospecting for underground water supplies - Appropriation or allocation of funds to department.

The department may use, for the purposes authorized by Code Sections 12-5-70 through 12-5-72, such funds as may be from time to time appropriated or allocated therefor.

(Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 5, § 3.)